Utah statutes.
63E-2-105.   Boards.

(1)  As used in this section, "director" includes a trustee or other board member.

(2)  Each independent corporation shall be governed by a board of directors.

(3)  The authorizing statute of each independent corporation shall specify:

(a)  the process for appointing, removing, and replacing directors;

(b)  the number and terms of office for directors;

(c)  the board chair selection procedure;

(d)  board quorum requirements;

(e)  director qualifications; and

(f)  the duties and fiduciary responsibilities of directors.

